Maryland, session 2026, HB0994.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
2–106.17.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE SELLERS OF TRAVEL SERVICES
REGISTRATION FUND.
(B) (1) THERE IS A SELLERS OF TRAVEL SERVICES REGISTRATION
FUND.
(2) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PAY ALL FEES COLLECTED UNDER
TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 22 OF THIS ARTICLE TO THE COMPTROLLER.
– 1 –

Ch. 611 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE FEES TO THE FUND.
(D) THE FUND SHALL BE USED TO COVER THE ACTUAL DOCUMENTED
DIRECT AND INDIRECT COSTS OF FULFILLING THE STATUTORY AND REGULATORY
DUTIES OF THE DEPARTMENT UNDER TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 22 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(E) THE SECRETARY OR A DESIGNEE OF THE SECRETARY SHALL
ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(F) THE LEGISLATIVE AUDITOR SHALL AUDIT THE ACCOUNTS AND
TRANSACTIONS OF THE FUND MAY BE SUBJECT TO AUDIT AS PROVIDED IN § 2–1220
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(G) ANY INVESTMENT EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO THE
GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
2–106.18.
(A) THE SECRETARY SHALL ANNUALLY CALCULATE THE DIRECT AND
INDIRECT COSTS ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE DEPARTMENT UNDER TITLE 17, SUBTITLE
22 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH FEES BASED ON THE
CALCULATIONS PROVIDED BY THE SECRETARY UNDER THIS SECTION.
(C) EACH FEE ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER TITLE 17,
SUBTITLE 22 OF THIS ARTICLE MAY NOT BE INCREASED ANNUALLY BY MORE THAN
12.5% OF THE EXISTING AND CORRESPONDING FEES OF THE DEPARTMENT UNDER
TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 22 OF THIS ARTICLE.
SUBTITLE 22. TRAVEL SERVICES.
17–2201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “INDEPENDENT AGENT” MEANS A PERSON THAT OFFERS OR
UNDERTAKES TO ARRANGE FOR OR PROVIDE THE TRAVEL SERVICES SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (C)(1)(II) OF THIS SECTION BUT DOES NOT:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 611
(1) RECEIVE MONEY OR OTHER VALUABLE CONSIDERATION
DIRECTLY FROM THE PURCHASER FOR THE SALE OF TRAVEL SERVICES OR FROM
THE ULTIMATE TRAVEL SUPPLIER;
(2) POSSESS AT ANY TIME ANY UNISSUED TICKET STOCK OR TRAVEL
DOCUMENT; OR
(3) HAVE THE ABILITY TO ISSUE TICKETS, VACATION CERTIFICATES,
OR ANY OTHER TRAVEL DOCUMENTS.
(C) (1) “SELLER OF TRAVEL” MEANS A PERSON THAT:
(I) IS LOCATED IN THE STATE OR OFFERS TO SELL TRAVEL
SERVICES TO A PERSON LOCATED IN THE STATE;
(II) OFFERS OR UNDERTAKES TO ARRANGE OR PROVIDE FOR:
1. TRAVEL RESERVATIONS OR ACCOMMODATIONS;
2. TICKETS FOR TRAVEL BY ANY MODE OF
TRANSPORTATION;
3. HOTEL OR MOTEL ACCOMMODATIONS;
4. CAR RENTALS; OR
5. SIGHTSEEING TOURS; AND
(III) RECEIVES VALUABLE CONSIDERATION DIRECTLY FROM
THE PURCHASER FOR THE SALE OF TRAVEL SERVICES OR FROM THE ULTIMATE
TRAVEL SUPPLIER.
(2) “SELLER OF TRAVEL” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) AN AIR CARRIER;
(II) AN OCEAN CARRIER; OR OR
(III) A HOTEL, MOTEL, PERSON THAT RENTS OR OPERATES A
SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT AS DEFINED IN § 11–101 OF THE TAX – GENERAL
ARTICLE FOR A PERIOD OF LESS THAN 30 CONSECUTIVE DAYS, SHORT–TERM RENTAL
PLATFORM AS DEFINED IN § 11–101 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE, OR SIMILAR
LODGING ESTABLISHMENT THAT, IN THE COURSE OF SELLING, PROVIDING, OR
– 3 –

Ch. 611 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
ARRANGING TRANSIENT LODGING ACCOMMODATIONS AND RELATED SERVICES FOR
ITS REGISTERED GUESTS:
1. ARRANGES OR PROVIDES FOR TRANSPORTATION; AND
2. DOES NOT DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY RECEIVE MONEY
OR OTHER VALUABLE CONSIDERATION FOR ARRANGING OR PROVIDING
TRANSPORTATION;
(IV) A PERSON THAT RENTS OR OPERATES A SHORT–TERM
RENTAL UNIT, AS DEFINED IN § 11–101 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE, FOR A
PERIOD OF LESS THAN 30 CONSECUTIVE DAYS; OR
(V) A SHORT–TERM RENTAL PLATFORM, AS DEFINED IN §
11–101 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
17–2202.
(A) (1) EACH SELLER OF TRAVEL OR INDEPENDENT AGENT SHALL FILE
ANNUALLY WITH THE DEPARTMENT PROOF OF PROFESSIONAL LIABILITY AND
ERRORS AND OMISSIONS INSURANCE IN THE AMOUNT OF AT LEAST $1,000,000 AS
REQUIRED BY THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) EACH SELLER OF TRAVEL SHALL FILE ANNUALLY WITH THE
DEPARTMENT A LIST OF INDEPENDENT AGENTS AFFILIATED WITH THE SELLER OF
TRAVEL.
(3) THE ANNUAL FILING FEE IS $300.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT RECEIVE VALUABLE CONSIDERATION IN PAYMENT
FOR SERVICES OFFERED FOR SALE BY A SELLER OF TRAVEL OR AN INDEPENDENT
AGENT UNLESS, AT THE TIME OF RECEIVING THE PAYMENT, THE SELLER OF TRAVEL
OR INDEPENDENT AGENT HAS MET THE ANNUAL FILING REQUIREMENTS UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED BY LAW, THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL PAY ALL FEES COLLECTED UNDER THIS TITLE TO THE COMPTROLLER.
(2) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE FEES TO THE
SELLERS OF TRAVEL SERVICES REGISTRATION FUND ESTABLISHED IN § 2–106.17
OF THIS ARTICLE.
17–2203.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 611
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE REASONABLE NOTICE OF THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SUBTITLE TO CONSUMERS AND SELLERS OF TRAVEL;
(2) ENFORCE THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(3) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING
REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING REQUIREMENTS AND PROCEDURES FOR THE
REGISTRATION OF SELLERS OF TRAVEL AND PROVIDING FOR THE ENFORCEMENT
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 5 –